Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.110

Witness fees and mileage.

Each person who appears before the committee, other than a state official or employee, may upon request receive for attendance the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record in accordance with the provisions of RCW 2.40.010, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers signed by such person and approved by the secretary and chair of the committee.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6019; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 11.]